Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2409
Degree or advanced degree, defined.

Degree or advanced degree means a baccalaureate, master's, or doctorate degree from an accredited institution and which includes studies in the core educational requirements.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 824.